Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
Operator’s License
186.531.
Fees for licenses, permits, and identification cards — Exceptions, when fee not to be assessed for personal identification cards — Voluntary donation to organ donor program — Acceptance of payment methods.

As used in this section:

“AOC Fund” means the circuit court clerk salary account created in KRS

27A.052

;

“GF” means the general fund;

“IP” means instruction permit;

“License Fund” or “LF” means the KYTC photo license account created in KRS

174.056

;

“MC” means motorcycle;

“MC Fund” or “MCF” means the motorcycle safety education program fund established in KRS

176.5065

;

“OL” means operator’s license; and

“PIDC” means personal identification card.

The fees imposed for voluntary travel ID operator’s licenses, instruction permits, and personal identification cards shall be as follows. The fees received shall be distributed as shown in the table. The fees shown, unless otherwise noted, are for an eight (8) year period:

Except as provided in subsection (11) of this section, the fees imposed for standard operator’s licenses, instruction permits, and personal identification cards shall be as follows:

If the identity document is issued through a circuit clerk’s office, the fees received shall be distributed as shown in the table. The fees shown, unless otherwise noted, are for an eight (8) year period:

If the identity document is issued through a Transportation Cabinet office, the fees received shall be distributed as shown in the table. The fees shown, unless otherwise noted, are for an eight (8) year period:

The fee for a second or subsequent duplicate personal identification card for a person who does not have a fixed, permanent address, as allowed under KRS 186.4122(5) and 186.4123(5), shall be the same as for a duplicate regular personal identification card.

The fee for a four (4) year original or renewal license issued pursuant to KRS

186.4101

shall be fifty percent (50%) of the amount shown in subsections (2) and (3) of this section. The distribution of fees shown in subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall also be reduced by fifty percent (50%) for licenses that are issued for four (4) years.

Any fee for any identity document applied for using alternative technology under KRS

186.410

and

186.4122

shall be distributed in the same manner as a document applied for in person with the cabinet.

An applicant for an original or renewal operator’s license, permit, commercial driver’s license, motorcycle operator’s license, or personal identification card shall be requested by the cabinet to make a donation to promote an organ donor program.

The donation under this subsection shall be added to the regular fee for an original or renewal motor vehicle operator’s license, permit, commercial driver’s license, motorcycle operator’s license, or personal identification card. One (1) donation may be made per issuance or renewal of a license or any combination thereof.

The fee shall be paid to the cabinet and shall be forwarded by the cabinet on a monthly basis to the Kentucky Circuit Court Clerks’ Trust for Life, and such moneys are hereby appropriated to be used exclusively for the purpose of promoting an organ donor program. A donation under this subsection shall be voluntary and may be refused by the applicant at the time of issuance or renewal.

In addition to the fees outlined in this section, the following individuals, upon application for an initial or renewal operator’s license, instruction permit, or personal identification card, shall pay an additional application fee of thirty dollars ($30), which shall be deposited in the photo license account:

An applicant who is not a United States citizen or permanent resident and who applies under KRS

186.4121

or

186.4123

; or

An applicant who is applying for a instruction permit, operator’s license, or personal identification card without a photo under KRS 186.4102(9).

Except for individuals exempted under paragraph (c) of this subsection, an applicant for relicensing after revocation or suspension shall pay a reinstatement fee of forty dollars ($40).

The reinstatement fee under this subsection shall be distributed by the State Treasurer as follows:

Thirty-five dollars ($35) shall be deposited into the photo license account; and

Five dollars ($5) shall be deposited into a trust and agency fund to be used in defraying the costs and expenses of administering a driver improvement program for problem drivers.

This subsection shall not apply to:

Any person whose license was suspended for failure to meet the conditions set out in KRS

186.411

when, within one (1) year of suspension, the driving privileges of the individual are reinstated; or

A student who has had his or her license revoked pursuant to KRS

159.051

.

As payment for any fee identified in this section, the cabinet:

Shall accept cash and personal checks; and

May accept other methods of payment in accordance with KRS

45.345

.

There shall be no fee assessed for the initial, renewal, or duplicate standard personal identification card to an individual, if the individual:

Does not possess a valid operator’s license or a commercial driver’s license; and

Is at least eighteen (18) years of age on or before the next regular election.

Card Type Fee LF GF MCF OL (initial/renewal) $48 $48 $0 $0 OL (Under 21) (Up to 4 years) $18 $18 $0 $0 Any OL, MC, or combination (duplicate/corrected) $15 $13.25 $1.75 $0 Motor vehicle IP (3 years) $18 $16 $2 $0 Motorcycle IP (1 year) $18 $13 $1 $4 Motorcycle OL (initial/renewal) $48 $38 $0 $10 Combination vehicle/MC OL (initial/renewal) $58 $48 $0 $10 PIDC (initial/renewal) $28 $25 $3 $0 PIDC (duplicate/corrected) $15 $13.50 $1.50 $0

Click to view

Card Fee Road License AOC GF MC Type Fund Fund Fund Fund OL (initial/renewal) $43 $28 $7 $8 $0 $0 OL (Under 21) (Up to 4 years) $15 $7.50 $4 $3.50 $0 $0 Any OL, MC OL or combination (duplicate /corrected) $15 $5.25 $4 $4 $1.75 $0 Motor vehicle IP (3 years) $15 $5 $4 $4 $2 $0 Motorcycle IP (1 year) $15 $5 $4 $1 $1 $4 Motorcycle OL (initial/renewal) $43 $17.50 $8 $7.50 $0 $10 Combination vehicle/MC OL (initial/renewal) $53 $25 $7 $11 $0 $10 PIDC (initial/renewal) $23 $8 $8 $4 $3 $0 PIDC (duplicate/corrected) $15 $6 $4 $3.50 $1.50 $0 PIDC (no fixed address) and KRS 186.4122(5) 186.4123(5) $10 $0 $5 $5 $0 $0

Click to view

Card Type Fee LF GF MCF OL(initial/renewal) $43 $43 $0 $0 OL (Under 21) (Up to 4 years) $15 $15 $0 $0 Any OL, MC, or combination (duplicate/corrected) $15 $13.25 $1.75 $0 Motor vehicle IP (3 years) $15 $13 $2 $0 Motorcycle IP (1 year) $15 $10 $1 $4 Motorcycle OL (initial/renewal) $43 $33 $0 $10 Combination vehicle/MC OL (initial/renewal) $53 $43 $0 $10 PIDC (initial/renewal) $23 $20 $3 $0 PIDC (duplicate/corrected) $15 $13.50 $1.50 $0 PIDC (no fixed address) under /186.4123(5) KRS 186.4122(5) $10 $10 $0 $0

Click to view

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 60, § 8; 1968, ch. 63, § 6; 1968, ch. 169, § 1; 1970, ch. 22, § 8; 1974, ch. 124, § 2; 1976, ch. 244, § 1; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 21, § 20, effective January 2, 1978; 1980, ch. 38, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 188, § 239, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 389, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 99, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 142, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 165, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 274, § 12, effective April 7, 1992; 1992, ch. 277, § 8, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 267, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 367, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 96, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 55, § 2, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 122, § 10, effective July 1, 2005; 2005, ch. 173, Pt. XV, § 1, effective July 1, 2005; 2011, ch. 79, § 1, effective June 8, 2011; repealed and reenacted by 2017 ch. 100, § 21, effective January 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 51, § 20, effective March 27, 2020; 2020 ch. 89, § 32, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 190, § 11, effective June 29, 2021.

Opinions of Attorney General.

On January 2, 1978 and thereafter circuit clerks should turn operator’s license fees into the Executive Department for Finance and Administration (now Finance and Administration Cabinet), which Department (now Cabinet) will in turn credit such fees to the general fund in the State Treasury.

OAG 77-100

.

186.5315.
Posting of notice about 1994 increases in fees of circuit clerks. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 267, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; repealed by 2017 ch. 100, § 39, effective January 1, 2019.

186.535.
Earmark of funds from operator’s license and motorcycle registration fees.

From the portion of the fee for each eight (8) year original or renewal operator’s license which is assigned to the photo license account under KRS

186.531

, two dollars ($2) shall be credited to a special account within the road fund, and shall be used exclusively by the Transportation Cabinet for the purpose of expanding the state driver education program, and two dollars ($2) shall be paid to the fiscal court of the county where the driver’s license is issued to be used by the fiscal court for county road purposes. The distribution of fees under this subsection shall be reduced by fifty percent (50%) for licenses issued for a four (4) year term in accordance with KRS

186.4101

.

From the fee for each annual registration of a motorcycle pursuant to KRS

186.050

, four dollars ($4) shall be credited to the motorcycle safety education program fund pursuant to KRS

176.5065

and shall be used exclusively for the purposes outlined in KRS

176.5061

to

176.5069

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 169, § 2; 1980, ch. 38, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1992, ch. 277, § 9, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 267, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 2010, ch. 61, § 4, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 100, § 25, effective January 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 51, § 21, effective March 27, 2020; 2021 ch. 190, § 12, effective June 29, 2021.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The phrase, “shall be used exclusively,” removes the account from the application of the lapsing statute, KRS

45.230

(now repealed).

OAG 69-424

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Appropriations, lapsing, KRS

45.229

.

186.540.
Application for corrected license or identification card upon change of address or name — No charge for corrected identity document if street name or postal address changed or if document contains error.

Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, when any person, after applying for or receiving an operator’s license or personal identification card, moves from the address named in the application or on the identity document issued to the person, or when the name of a identity document holder is changed, by marriage or otherwise, the person shall within ten (10) days after the change apply to the Transportation Cabinet for the issuance of a corrected license. The fee for a corrected license shall be as set forth in KRS

186.531

.

If an identity document holder’s street name or postal address is changed and the person has not moved to a new residence, the person shall apply to the cabinet for a corrected identity document, which shall be issued free of charge.

If a person receives an identity document that contains an error, the person shall apply to the cabinet for a corrected identity document, which shall be issued free of charge.

History.

2739m-68; 1994, ch. 393, § 10, effective January 1, 1995; 2006, ch. 235, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2017 ch. 100, § 26, effective January 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 51, § 22, effective March 27, 2020.

186.550.
Courts to report convictions and send licenses to cabinet — Exception for offenses committed under KRS Chapter 189A.

Except for offenses committed under KRS Chapter 189A, the clerk of any court having jurisdiction over offenses committed under motor vehicle laws shall report upon a form furnished by the cabinet the conviction, pleas or forfeiture of bond arising under motor vehicle laws, to the cabinet within fifteen (15) days.

The court shall take up the motor vehicle operator’s license certificate of a person convicted of any of the offenses for which mandatory revocation is provided by KRS

186.560

and have it immediately forwarded to the cabinet with the report covering the conviction.

History.

2739m-48: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 175, effective January 2, 1978; 2019 ch. 103, § 23, effective July 1, 2020.

186.560.
Mandatory revocation or denial of license — Causes — Period of revocation or denial — Prohibition against reductions of certain revocations or denials — Limited exception relating to enrollment in alcohol or substance abuse education or treatment programs.

The cabinet shall forthwith revoke the license of any operator of a motor vehicle upon receiving record of his or her:

Conviction of any of the following offenses:

Murder or manslaughter resulting from the operation of a motor vehicle;

Driving a vehicle which is not a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or any other substance which may impair one’s driving ability;

Perjury or the making of a false affidavit under KRS

186.400

to

186.640

or any law requiring the registration of motor vehicles or regulating their operation on highways;

Any felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle is used;

Conviction or forfeiture of bail upon three (3) charges of reckless driving within the preceding twelve (12) months;

Conviction of driving a motor vehicle involved in an accident and failing to stop and disclose his identity at the scene of the accident;

Conviction of theft of a motor vehicle or any of its parts, including the conviction of any person under the age of eighteen (18) years;

Failure to have in full force and effect the security required by Subtitle 39 of KRS Chapter 304 upon conviction of a second and each subsequent offense within any five (5) year period;

Conviction for fraudulent use of a driver’s license or use of a fraudulent driver’s license to purchase or attempt to purchase alcoholic beverages, as defined in KRS

241.010

, in violation of KRS 244.085(4);

Conviction of operating a motor vehicle, motorcycle, or moped without an operator’s license as required by KRS

186.410

; and

Conviction of fleeing or evading police in the second degree when the offense involved the operation of a motor vehicle; or

Being found incompetent to stand trial under KRS Chapter 504.

If the person convicted of any offense named in subsection (1) of this section or who is found incompetent to stand trial is not the holder of a license, the cabinet shall deny the person so convicted a license for the same period of time as though he had possessed a license which had been revoked. If through an inadvertence the defendant should be issued a license, the cabinet shall forthwith cancel it.

The cabinet, upon receiving a record of the conviction of any person upon a charge of operating a motor vehicle while the license of that person is denied, or suspended, or revoked, or while his privilege to operate a motor vehicle is withdrawn, shall immediately extend the period of the first denial, suspension, revocation, or withdrawal for an additional like period.

The revocation or denial of a license or the withdrawal of the privilege of operating a motor vehicle for a violation of subsection (1)(a)1. of this section shall be for a period of not less than five (5) years. Revocations or denials under this section shall not be subject to any lessening of penalties authorized under any other provision of this section or any other statute.

Except as provided in subsections (3), (4), (8), and (9) of this section, in all other cases, the revocation or denial of a license or the withdrawal of the privilege of operating a motor vehicle under this section shall be for a period of six (6) months, except that if the same person has had one (1) previous conviction of any offense enumerated in subsection (1) of this section, regardless of whether the person’s license was revoked because of the previous conviction, the period of the revocation, denial, or withdrawal shall be one (1) year. If the person has had more than one (1) previous conviction of the offenses considered collectively as enumerated in subsection (1) of this section, regardless of whether the person’s license was revoked for any previous conviction, the period of revocation, denial, or withdrawal shall be for not less than two (2) years. If the cabinet, upon receipt of the written recommendation of the court in which any person has been convicted of violating KRS 189.520(1) or 244.085(4) as relates to instances in which a driver’s license or fraudulent driver’s license was the identification used or attempted to be used in the commission of the offense, who has had no previous conviction of said offense, the person’s operator’s license shall not be revoked, but the person’s operator’s license shall be restricted to any terms and conditions the secretary in his discretion may require, provided the person has enrolled in an alcohol or substance abuse education or treatment program as the cabinet shall require. If the person fails to satisfactorily complete the education or treatment program or violates the restrictions on his operator’s license, the cabinet shall immediately revoke his operator’s license for a period of six (6) months.

In order to secure the reinstatement of a license to operate a motor vehicle or motorcycle restored following a period of suspension pursuant to KRS Chapter 189A, the person whose license is suspended shall comply with the fees and other procedures of the Transportation Cabinet with regard to the reinstatement of suspended licenses.

The cabinet shall revoke the license of any operator of a motor vehicle upon receiving notification that the person is under age eighteen (18) and has dropped out of school or is academically deficient, as defined in KRS 159.051(1).

A person under the age of eighteen (18) who is convicted of the offenses of subsections (1) or (3) of this section, except for subsection (1)(a)8. or 9. of this section, shall have his license revoked until he reaches the age of eighteen (18) or shall have his license revoked as provided in this section, whichever penalty will result in the longer period of revocation.

A revocation or denial of a license or the withdrawal of the privilege of operating a motor vehicle under this section due to a person being found incompetent to stand trial shall extend until the person is found competent to stand trial or the criminal case is dismissed.

History.

2739m-49: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 127, § 7; 1966, ch. 17, § 1; 1974, ch. 217, § 1; 1980, ch. 103, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 129, § 3, effective January 1, 1985; 1984, ch. 165, § 15, effective July 13, 1985; 1986, ch. 376, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 434, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 443, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 222, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 234, § 5, effective July 13, 1990; 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 20, effective July 1, 1991; 1996, ch. 198, § 8, effective October 1, 1996; 2000, ch. 467, §§ 26, 29, effective October 1, 2000; 2006, ch. 235, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2013, ch. 16, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 62, § 117, effective June 29, 2017; 2019 ch. 103, § 24, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 97, § 3, effective July 15, 2020.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/25/2013). In codifying
2013 Ky. Acts ch. 16, sec. 1, (this statute), a reference in subsection (8) to “subsection (1)(a)8. or 8. of this section” has been changed to “subsection (1)(a)8. or 9. of this section.” The internal numbering of subsection (1) of this statute was modified by that Act, but the reference in subsection (8) of this statute was incorrectly modified to conform with that renumbering. The Reviser of Statutes has corrected this manifest clerical or typographical error in codification under the authority of
KRS 7.136(1)(h).

186.565.
Consent to test for alcohol in blood — Procedure upon refusal — Ruling — Judicial review — Exception — Application to court to enter driver’s education program. [Repealed.]

186.570.
Denial or suspension of license — Informal hearing — Appeal — Surrender of certificate — Medical review board — Prohibition against raising insurance on basis of denial or suspension for child support arrearage.

The cabinet or its agent designated in writing for that purpose may deny any person an operator’s license or may suspend the operator’s license of any person, or, in the case of a nonresident, withdraw the privilege of operating a motor vehicle in this state, subject to a hearing and with or without receiving a record of conviction of that person of a crime, if the cabinet has reason to believe that:

That person has committed any offenses for the conviction of which mandatory revocation of a license is provided by KRS

186.560

.

That person has, by reckless or unlawful operation of a motor vehicle, caused, or contributed to an accident resulting in death or injury or serious property damage.

That person has a mental or physical disability that makes it unsafe for him to drive upon the highways. The Transportation Cabinet shall, by administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, establish a medical review board to provide technical assistance in the review of the driving ability of these persons. The board shall consist of licensed medical and rehabilitation specialists.

That person is an habitually reckless or negligent driver of a motor vehicle or has committed a serious violation of the motor vehicle laws.

That person has been issued a license without making proper application for it, as provided in KRS

186.412

or

186.412

1 and administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A.

That person has presented false or misleading information as to the person’s residency, citizenship, religious convictions, or immigration status.

A person required by KRS

186.480

to take an examination has been issued a license without first having passed the examination.

That person has been convicted of assault and battery resulting from the operation of a motor vehicle.

That person has failed to appear pursuant to a citation or summons issued by a law enforcement officer of this Commonwealth or any other jurisdiction.

That person has failed to appear pursuant to an order by the court to produce proof of security required by KRS

304.39-010

and a receipt showing that a premium for a minimum policy period of six (6) months has been paid.

That person is a habitual violator of KRS

304.39-080

. For purposes of this section, a “habitual violator” shall mean any person who has operated a motor vehicle without security on the motor vehicle as required by Subtitle 39 of this chapter three (3) or more times within a five (5) year period, in violation of KRS

304.99-060

(2).

The cabinet shall deny any person a license or shall suspend the license of an operator of a motor vehicle upon receiving written notification from the Cabinet for Health and Family Services that the person has a child support arrearage which equals or exceeds the cumulative amount which would be owed after six (6) months of nonpayment or failure, after receiving appropriate notice, to comply with a subpoena or warrant relating to paternity or child support proceedings, as provided by 42

U.S.C. secs. 651

et seq.; except that any child support arrearage which exists prior to January 1, 1994, shall not be included in the calculation to determine whether the license of an operator of a motor vehicle shall be denied or suspended. The denial or suspension shall continue until the arrearage has been eliminated, payments on the child support arrearage are being made in accordance with a court or administrative order, or the person complies with the subpoena or warrant relating to paternity or child support. Before the license may be reinstated, proof of elimination of the child support arrearage or proof of compliance with the subpoena or warrant relating to paternity or child support proceedings as provided by 42

U.S.C. sec. 666(a)(16)

from the court where the action is pending or the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall be received by the Transportation Cabinet as prescribed by administrative regulations promulgated by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services and the Transportation Cabinet.

The cabinet or its agent designated in writing for that purpose shall deny any person an operator’s license or shall suspend the operator’s license of any person, or, in the case of a nonresident, withdraw the privilege of operating a motor vehicle in this state:

Where the person has been declared ineligible to operate a motor vehicle under KRS

532.356

for the duration of the ineligibility, upon notification of the court’s judgment; or

Upon receiving written notification from the Finance and Administration Cabinet, Department of Revenue, that the person is a delinquent taxpayer as provided in KRS

131.1817

. The denial or suspension shall continue until a written tax clearance has been received by the cabinet from the Finance and Administration Cabinet, Department of Revenue. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (4) of this section, a person whose license is denied or suspended under this paragraph shall have thirty (30) days from the date the cabinet mails the notice to request a hearing.

The cabinet or its agent designated in writing for that purpose shall provide any person subject to the suspension, revocation, or withdrawal of their driving privileges, under provisions of this section, an informal hearing. Upon determining that the action is warranted, the cabinet shall notify the person in writing by mailing the notice to the person by first-class mail to the last known address of the person. The hearing shall be automatically waived if not requested within twenty (20) days after the cabinet mails the notice. The hearing shall be scheduled as early as practical within twenty (20) days after receipt of the request at a time and place designated by the cabinet. An aggrieved party may appeal a decision rendered as a result of an informal hearing, and upon appeal an administrative hearing shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

The cabinet may suspend the operator’s license of any resident upon receiving notice of the conviction of that person in another state of an offense there which, if committed in this state, would be grounds for the suspension or revocation of an operator’s license. The cabinet shall not suspend an operator’s license under this paragraph if:

The conviction causing the suspension or revocation is more than five (5) years old;

The conviction is for a traffic offense other than a felony traffic offense or a habitual violator offense; and

The license holder complies with the provisions of KRS

186.442

.

If, at the time of application for an initial Kentucky operator’s license, a person’s license is suspended or revoked in another state for a conviction that is less than five (5) years old, the cabinet shall deny the person a license until the person resolves the matter in the other state and complies with the provisions of this chapter.

The cabinet may, upon receiving a record of the conviction in this state of a nonresident driver of a motor vehicle of any offense under the motor vehicle laws, forward a notice of that person’s conviction to the proper officer in the state of which the convicted person is a resident.

This subsection shall not apply to a commercial driver’s license.

The Transportation Cabinet is forbidden from suspending or revoking an operator’s license or assessing points or any other form of penalty against the license holder for speeding violations or speeding convictions from other states. This subsection shall apply only to speeding violations. This section shall not apply to a person who holds or is required to hold a commercial driver’s license.

Each operator’s license which has been canceled, suspended, or revoked shall be surrendered to and destroyed by the cabinet. At the end of the period of cancellation, suspension, or revocation, the license holder may reapply under KRS

186.412

or

186.4121

, after the licensee has complied with all requirements for the issuance or reinstatement of his or her driving privilege.

Insurance companies issuing motor vehicle policies in the Commonwealth shall be prohibited from raising a policyholder’s rates solely because the policyholder’s driving privilege has been suspended or denied pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

History.

2739m-50: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 127, § 8; 1968, ch. 152, § 121; 1972, ch. 92, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(7); 1978, ch. 287, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1990, ch. 455, § 30, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 136, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 381, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 416, § 8, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 318, § 72, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 341, § 11, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 255, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 426, § 123, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 442, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 565, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2001, ch. 139, § 1, effective June 21, 2001; 2002, ch. 264, § 7, effective July 15, 2002; 2003, ch. 189, § 3, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 99, § 145, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 152, § 3, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 165, § 3, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 21, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2013, ch. 119, § 4, effective July 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 100, § 27, effective January 1, 2019.

186.572.
Assessment of penalty points for speeding on limited access highway.

Conviction for any one (1) of the following moving hazardous violations on a limited access highway or a limited access highway of four (4) or more lanes in Kentucky on which the speed limit is sixty-five (65) mph or higher shall be cause for assessment of the penalty points indicated:

Speeding 10 mph or less over the limit 0 points.

Click to view

History.

Enact. Acts 1987 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 36, § 7; 1988, ch. 177, § 4, effective July 15, 1988.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

An Overview of Kentucky’s New Court System,
Vol. 41, No. 2, April 1977 Ky. Bench & B. 13.

186.574.
State traffic school for new drivers and for traffic offenders — Fee — Procedures — County attorney-operated traffic safety program.

The Transportation Cabinet shall establish a state traffic school for new drivers and for traffic offenders. The school shall be composed of uniform education and training elements designed to create a lasting influence on new drivers and a corrective influence on traffic offenders. District Courts may in lieu of assessing penalties for traffic offenses, other than for KRS

189A.010

, sentence offenders to state traffic school and no other.

If a District Court stipulates in its judgment of conviction that a person attend state traffic school, the court shall indicate this in the space provided on the abstract of conviction filed with the Transportation Cabinet. Upon receipt of an abstract, the Transportation Cabinet, or its representative, shall schedule the person to attend state traffic school. Failure of the person to attend and satisfactorily complete state traffic school in compliance with the court order, may be punished as contempt of the sentencing court. The Transportation Cabinet shall not assess points against a person who satisfactorily completes state traffic school. However, if the person referred to state traffic school holds or is required to hold a commercial driver’s license, the underlying offense shall appear on the person’s driving history record.

The Transportation Cabinet shall supervise, operate, and administer state traffic school, and shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A governing facilities, equipment, courses of instruction, instructors, and records of the program. In the event a person sentenced under subsection (1) of this section does not attend or satisfactorily complete state traffic school, the Transportation Cabinet may deny that person a license or suspend the license of that person until he reschedules attendance or completes state traffic school, at which time a denial or suspension shall be rescinded.

Persons participating in the state traffic school as provided in this section shall pay a fee of fifteen dollars ($15) to defray the cost of operating the school, except that if enrollment in state traffic school is to satisfy the requirement of KRS 186.410(4)(c), a fee shall not be assessed. Any funds collected pursuant to KRS 186.535(1) that are dedicated to the photo license account for use in the state driver education program may be used for the purposes of state traffic school.

The following procedures shall govern persons attending state traffic school pursuant to this section:

A person convicted of any violation of traffic codes set forth in KRS Chapters 177, 186, or 189, and who is otherwise eligible, may in the sole discretion of the trial judge, be sentenced to attend state traffic school. Upon payment of the fee required by subsection (4) of this section, and upon successful completion of state traffic school, the sentence to state traffic school shall be the person’s penalty in lieu of any other penalty, except for the payment of court costs;

Except as provided in KRS 189.990(28), a person shall not be eligible to attend state traffic school who has been cited for a violation of KRS Chapters 177, 186, or 189 that has a penalty of mandatory revocation or suspension of an offender’s driver’s license;

Except as provided in KRS 189.990(28), a person shall not be eligible to attend state traffic school for any violation if, at the time of the violation, the person did not have a valid driver’s license or the person’s driver’s license was suspended or revoked by the cabinet;

Except as provided in KRS 189.990(28), a person shall not be eligible to attend state traffic school more than once in any one (1) year period, unless the person wants to attend state traffic school to comply with the driver education requirements of KRS

186.410

; and

The cabinet shall notify the sentencing court regarding any person who was sentenced to attend state traffic school who was ineligible to attend state traffic school. A court notified by the cabinet pursuant to this paragraph shall return the person’s case to an active calendar for a hearing on the matter. The court shall issue a summons for the person to appear and the person shall demonstrate to the court why an alternative sentence should not be imposed.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a county attorney may operate a traffic safety program for traffic offenders prior to the adjudication of the offense.

Offenders alleged to have violated KRS

189A.010

or

304.39-080

, offenders holding a commercial driver’s license under KRS Chapter 281A, or offenders coming within the provisions of subsection (5)(b) or (c) of this section shall be excluded from participation in a county attorney-operated program.

A county attorney that operates a traffic safety program:

May charge a reasonable fee to program participants, which shall only be used for payment of county attorney office operating expenses; and

Shall, by October 1 of each year, report to the Prosecutors Advisory Council the fee charged for the county attorney-operated traffic safety program and the total number of traffic offenders diverted into the county attorney-operated traffic safety program for the preceding fiscal year categorized by traffic offense.

Each participant in a county attorney-operated traffic safety program shall, in addition to the fee payable to the county attorney, pay a twenty-five dollar ($25) fee to the court clerk, which shall be paid into a trust and agency account with the Administrative Office of the Courts and is to be used by the circuit clerks to hire additional deputy clerks and to enhance deputy clerk salaries.

Each participant in a county attorney-operated traffic safety program shall, in addition to the fee payable to the county attorney and the fee required by paragraph (d) of this subsection, pay a thirty dollar ($30) fee to the county attorney in lieu of court costs. On a monthly basis, the county attorney shall forward the fees collected pursuant to this paragraph to the Finance and Administration Cabinet to be distributed as follows:

Ten and eight-tenths percent (10.8%) to the spinal cord and head injury research trust fund created in KRS

211.504

;

Nine and one-tenth percent (9.1%) to the traumatic brain injury trust fund created in KRS

211.476

;

Five and eight-tenths percent (5.8%) to the special trust and agency account set forth in KRS 42.320(2)(f) for the Department of Public Advocacy;

Five and seven-tenths percent (5.7%) to the crime victims compensation fund created in KRS

49.480

;

One and two-tenths percent (1.2%) to the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet to defray the costs of conducting record checks on prospective firearms purchasers pursuant to the Brady Handgun Violence Prevention Act and for the collection, testing, and storing of DNA samples;

Sixteen and eight-tenths percent (16.8%) to the county sheriff in the county from which the fee was received;

Nine and one-tenth percent (9.1%) to the county treasurer in the county from which the fee was received to be used by the fiscal court for the purposes of defraying the costs of operation of the county jail and the transportation of prisoners;

Thirty-three and two-tenths percent (33.2%) to local governments in accordance with the formula set forth in KRS 24A.176(5); and

Eight and three-tenths percent (8.3%) to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services for the implementation and operation of a telephonic behavioral health jail triage system as provided in KRS

210.365

and

441.048

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 248, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 165, § 17, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 258, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 198, § 9, effective October 1, 1996; 1998, ch. 124, § 9, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 232, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 183, § 15, effective August 1, 2002; 2005, ch. 165, § 4, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 108, § 3, effective July 15, 2008; 2012, ch. 107, § 1, effective July 12, 2012; 2014, ch. 71, § 8, effective July 15, 2014; 2015 ch. 36, § 1, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 74, § 92, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 51, § 23, effective March 27, 2020.

186.575.
Highway patrol to take up canceled, revoked or suspended licenses. [Repealed.]